Connecticut, session 2026, SB00392.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Section 9-451 of the general statutes is repealed and the
2 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective January 1, 2027):
3 The nomination by a minor party of any candidate for office,
4 including an office established after the last-preceding election, and the
5 selection in a municipality by a minor party of town committee
6 members or delegates to conventions [may] shall be made in the manner
7 prescribed in the rules of such party, or alterations or amendments
8 thereto, filed with the Secretary of the State in accordance with section
9 9-374.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 January 1, 2027 9-451
GAE Joint Favorable
SB392 / File No. 496 1

SB392 File No. 496
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill requires minor parties to select candidates and delegates in
accordance with their party rules, resulting in no fiscal impact to the
state or municipalities.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
SB392 / File No. 496 2

SB392 File No. 496
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 392
AN ACT CONCERNING RULES OF MINOR POLITICAL PARTIES.